Hawaii statutes.
PART V.
FINANCIAL

§432:2-501 Investments. A society
shall invest its funds only in such investments as are authorized by the laws
of this State for the investment of assets of life insurers and subject to the
limitations thereon. Any foreign or alien society permitted or seeking to do
business in this State which invests its funds in accordance with the laws of
the state, district, territory, country or province in which it is
incorporated, shall be held to meet the requirements of this section for the
investment of funds. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next